District of Columbia statutes.
38-1803.14

Consultants.

Upon the request of the World Class Schools Task Force, the head of any department or agency of the Federal Government may detail any of the personnel of such agency to such task force to assist such task force in carrying out such task force’s duties under this subchapter.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [255], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2314

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.34.